src/sma-lex.txt
! This is for compounding with hyphen. All entries REQUIRING a hyphen should point to this:
LEXICON RHyph ! Recursive lexicon from all classes REQUIRING a hyphen to follow.
              ! NBNBNB!!! The hyphen should be added here! NOT in the other lexicons!

                +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Noun ;                                     ! This is the normal case.
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%-# Verb ;       ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%-# Adjective ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation

 +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Acronym ;    ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
 +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for hyph-words.
                               ! London-Hull is covered here, whereas Hull-viessu
                               ! is covered by RHyph + Noun.

         +RCmpnd:%- ENDLEX ;      ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller
+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# HyphNouns ; ! Go to words requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-

! Proper noun compounds without hyphens are NOT presently covered - if they were
! to be added, they need to be marked +Use/Sub. Examples: LondonHull & viessuLondon.

! ============================
! Nominal inflection sublexica
! ============================

! Inflection for odd-syllable nouns
! ---------------------------------
LEXICON N_ODD
 +N+Sg: N_ODD_SG ;
 +N+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:e%^DISIMP R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:e%>%^DISIMPn R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON N_ODD_LOAN
  +N+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;  ! romer
  +N+Sg: N_ODD_SG ; ! romere etc.
  +N+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
  +N:    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:e%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:e%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;
  
LEXICON N_ODD_NODISIMP
  +N+Sg+Nom:e         FINAL1 ;
  +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>amme FINAL1 ;
  +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:%>adth FINAL1 ;
  +N+Sg+Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
  +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2:%>amth FINAL1 ;
  +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
  +N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:%>assedh FINAL1 ;
  +N+Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
  +N+Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
  +N+Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:%>istie FINAL1 ; !Miesie Mavve
  +N+Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Sg+Com+PxSg2:%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:%>idie FINAL1 ;  !Miesie Mavve
  +N+Pl+Gen:%>i       FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>ij       FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Com:%>igujmie FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>igyjmie FINAL1 ; !
 +N:    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:e R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:e%>n R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>i R ;


LEXICON N_ODD_SG
  +Nom:e%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg1:%>amme FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg2:%>adth FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg2:%>amth FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg1:%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg2:%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg3:%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +Ill+PxSg2:%>assedh FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
  +Ela+Use/Sub:%>%^DISIMPistie FINAL1 ; !Miesie Mavve
  +Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Com+PxSg2:%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_ODD_PL
  +Nom:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+Use/Sub:%>%^DISIMPidie FINAL1 ;  !Miesie Mavve
  +Gen:%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+Use/Sub:%>%^DISIMPij       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Use/Sub:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !

LEXICON N_ODD_ESS
  +Ess:%>inie          FINAL1 ;
  
LEXICON ÅABPETJH !default N_ODD plural lexicon
  +N+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMP IGENSUFF ;
  +N+Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
  +N+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !
  +N+Ess:%>inie          FINAL1 ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:e%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:%»adtj NIEJTE_PL ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj EVEN_ESS ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+SgNomCmp:%»adtje    R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp:%»adtj%>i  R ;


  
LEXICON N_ODD_C   !these words have consonant-ending in nominative
 +N+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg1:%>amme FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg2:%>adth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Acc+PxSg2:%>amth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg1:%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg2:%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg3:%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Ill+PxSg2:%>assedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Com+PxSg2:%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:e%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;


LEXICON AAJEGE        !Sg+Nom=Aajege/Aajeh  Sg+Cmp=Aajeh-
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:h%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:ge%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ge%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ge%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:g%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:g%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:g%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:g%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg1:g%>amme FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg2:g%>adth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Acc+PxSg2:g%>amth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg1:g%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg2:g%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg3:g%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Ill+PxSg2:g%>assedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Com+PxSg2:g%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:g N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:g    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ge%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:g%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:g%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;
  
LEXICON AAREGE        !Sg+Nom=Aarege/Aareh  Sg+Cmp=Aarege-/Aareh-
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:h%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:ge%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ge%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ge%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:g%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:g%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:g%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:g%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg1:g%>amme FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg2:g%>adth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Acc+PxSg2:g%>amth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg1:g%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg2:g%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg3:g%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Ill+PxSg2:g%>assedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Com+PxSg2:g%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:g N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:g    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:ge%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ge%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:g%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:g%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON BAARTEGE        !Sg+Nom=baartege/baarth  Sg+Cmp=baartege-/baarth-
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:h%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:ege%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ege%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ege%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:eg%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:eg%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:eg%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eg%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg1:eg%>amme FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg2:eg%>adth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Acc+PxSg2:eg%>amth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg1:eg%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg2:eg%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg3:eg%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Ill+PxSg2:eg%>assedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Com+PxSg2:eg%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:eg N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:eg    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:ege%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ege%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:eg%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:eg%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;


LEXICON GAAJSEGE        !Sg+Nom=gaajsege/gaajsh  Sg+Cmp=gaajsh-
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:h%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:ege%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ege%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ege%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:eg%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:eg%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:eg%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eg%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg1:eg%>amme FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg2:eg%>adth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Acc+PxSg2:eg%>amth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg1:eg%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg2:eg%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg3:eg%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Ill+PxSg2:eg%>assedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Com+PxSg2:eg%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:eg N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:eg    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ege%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:eg%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:eg%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON LAADTEGE        !Sg+Nom=laadtege  Sg+Cmp=laadth-
 +N+Sg+Nom:ege%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ege%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ege%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:eg%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:eg%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:eg%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eg%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg1:eg%>amme FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg2:eg%>adth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Acc+PxSg2:eg%>amth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg1:eg%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg2:eg%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg3:eg%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Ill+PxSg2:eg%>assedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Com+PxSg2:eg%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:eg N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:eg    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ege%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:eg%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:eg%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;
  
LEXICON SAADTEGE        !Sg+Nom=saadtege  Sg+Cmp=saadtege-/saadth-
 +N+Sg+Nom:ege%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ege%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ege%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:eg%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:eg%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:eg%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eg%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg1:eg%>amme FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg2:eg%>adth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Acc+PxSg2:eg%>amth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg1:eg%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg2:eg%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg3:eg%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Ill+PxSg2:eg%>assedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Com+PxSg2:eg%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:eg N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:eg    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:ege%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ege%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:eg%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:eg%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;



LEXICON LEEJJEGE        !Sg+Nom=leejjege  Sg+Cmp=leejjeh-
 +N+Sg+Nom:ge%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ge%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ge%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:g%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:g%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:g%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:g%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg1:g%>amme FINAL1 ;
 +N+Nom+PxSg2:g%>adth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Acc+PxSg2:g%>amth FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg1:g%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg2:g%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Gen+PxSg3:g%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +N+Ill+PxSg2:g%>assedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Com+PxSg2:g%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:g N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:g    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ge%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:g%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:g%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;
  
